Mississippi, session 2026, HB165.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, the State Department of Education, in conjunction with the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning acting for and on behalf of the University of Mississippi Medical Center (UMMC), shall establish and implement a program known as the "Dream Makers Program" for public school students in Grades 7 and 8, the purpose of which will be to stimulate interest in science and mathematics and the health care professions, especially among underserved and underrepresented populations in Mississippi, and to increase awareness of the urgent need for health care workers in our state. (2)  The program established under subsection (1) of this section for the introduction of students to a potential career in the health care professions must be conducted as an after-school program, during which time students must be provided guidance about health-related careers and how science and mathematics pertain to these areas from a licensed school district employee with adequate certification in science or mathematics, or both.  The State Department of Education and the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning shall determine the frequency that the program will meet, as well as the number of meetings required to be facilitated by a UMMC medical student, resident or health care professional. (3)  The program must be a two-year course of study for those students meeting the eligibility requirements of this subsection.  A student may not be admitted to the program before the end of the first academic grading period for the student's school district. Eligibility for participation is limited to students who: (a)  Maintain a cumulative 2.5 grade point average on a 4.0 scale; (b)  Are recommended by the their science or mathematics teachers, or both; (c)  Have a consistent record of attendance; (d)  Display positive attitudes, character and citizenship; and (e)  Express a desire to expand their knowledge of health care and medicine. However, before any student is accepted for participation under the criteria of this subsection, that student's parent, legal guardian or custodian must submit written authorization agreeing to the student's participation in the program. (4)  Each program must include, but not be limited to, the following components: (a)  Dissection of various specimens; (b)  Blood pressure and temperature reading instruction; (c)  A health care professionals panel; (d)  Instructional interaction with UMMC medical students; (e)  Activities planned by individual program advisors; and (f)  An end-of-the-year awards banquet. A program advisor, with the consent of the State Department of Education, may modify the program under his or her authority to expand the instructional components offered to the students served by the program. (5)  Students participating in the program are expected to attend all meetings of the program; a student may not exceed one (1) excused absence per year in order to remain eligible for participation in the end-of-the-year awards banquet.  Any student missing in excess of one (1) absence per year may elect, but is not required, to continue participating in the program. (6)  Nothing in this section may be construed to conflict with or repeal the provisions of law relating to after-school mentoring programs under Section 37-3-85. SECTION 2. (1)  Each local school district shall designate a program advisor, who shall perform the necessary services to facilitate the execution of the program goals, objectives and activities by: (a)  Providing health care career exposure; (b)  Identifying, recruiting, selecting, mentoring and advising a group of seventh and eighth graders from the school district to participate in the Dream Makers Program; (c)  Providing the minimum number of health care careers workshops per year, as designated by the State Department of Education and Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning, to students in the Dream Makers Program; (d)  Providing Dream Makers student leadership workshops through community entities; (e)  Providing an evening presentation to members of the Dream Makers Program and their families on the costs associated with higher education and available sources of financial aid; (f)  Addressing unique issues relating to the cultural beliefs of the students from the local school district region about science and health care professions; and (g)  Educating students, families and communities about health care professions and UMMC. (2)  The program advisor shall develop session topics, which must include areas of health care that are available and relevant to the community. (3)  The local school district shall designate a regional coordinator for the district, who will assist the program advisor in securing local health professionals for student workshops.  The regional coordinator also will assist in planning the schedule and activities with the program advisor and local health care professionals. (4)  UMMC shall designate a staff member to act as project coordinator between UMMC and the program advisor.  Throughout the period of the program, copies of all correspondence, work products, specifications, estimates and other materials prepared by the advisor must be directed to the project coordinator and also to any other UMMC personnel designated by the project coordinator.  Direct contact or communication by the program advisor with other UMMC offices or any other state or governmental entity concerning the program may be made only with the prior knowledge and approval of the project coordinator and the State Department of Education. (5)  (a)  The program advisor shall file with the project coordinator a monthly progress report and schedule for the program.  One (1) copy must be forwarded to UMMC in sufficient time to be received no later than the tenth day of the month immediately following the end of the month covered by the report. (b)  Each report must include a summary of accomplishments during the past month, a projection of work to be accomplished during the month the report is filed, and a long-range projection of work to be accomplished during the next three (3) months.  Any information required from UMMC and the dates that information is necessary in order to maintain the schedule must be specifically identified in these reports. (c)  A monthly report and schedule must be submitted until the program is completed. (d)  The schedule must show clearly the reason for any delay, such as program clarification or revision or delay in receipt of UMMC information or approvals, and must include the dates that each delay started and ended. (6)  If requested by the project coordinator, the program advisor shall meet, as soon as possible, with the project coordinator and other UMMC and State Department of Education staff to discuss final details relative to commencement of and performance of this program in the local school district. SECTION 3. (1)  There is established in the State Treasury a fund to be known as the "Dream Makers Trust Fund."  The purpose of the fund is to provide financial support to local school districts and schools for start-up costs and costs associated with implementing and operating the Dream Makers Program.  The fund may consist of monies obtained from grants from the federal government, funds made available by the Legislature, and grants, gifts, devises and donations from any public or private source.  The State Board of Education and the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning shall administer the fund and may apply for any grants from the federal government or private sources. (2)  The State Board of Education and the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning jointly shall adopt rules and regulations necessary for the implementation of this section.  If sufficient funds are available for this purpose, monies from the Dream Makers Trust Fund must be distributed to qualifying school districts and schools in accordance with the procedures established by the State Board of Education and the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.